Oklahoma, session 2026, SB963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1709, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1709. A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority may provide


by resolution, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of


turnpike revenue bonds of the Authority for the purpose of paying


all or any part of the cost of any one or more turnpike projects in


such amount or amounts not to exceed Two Billion Seven Hundred Ten


Million Dollars ($2,710,000,000.00) in total aggregate indebtedness


outstanding at any time. The Authority, when it finds that it would


be economical and beneficial to do so, may combine two or more, or


any part thereof, or all of its proposed projects into one unit and


consider the same as one project to the same extent and with like

Req. No. 1337 Page 1


effect as if the same were a single project. The principal of and


the interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds


provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated,


shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the


limitations pertaining to public trust indebtedness from time to


time expressed in subsection E F of Section 176 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding


forty (40) years from their date or dates, as may be determined by


the Authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the


option of the Authority at such price or prices and pursuant to such


terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority prior to the


issuance of the bonds. The Authority shall determine the form of


the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto,


and the manner of execution of the bonds, and shall fix the


denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places


of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or


trust company within or without the state. If any officer whose


signature or facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or


coupons shall cease to be said such officer before the delivery of


the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be


valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the person had


remained in office until such delivery. All bonds issued pursuant


to the provisions of this article shall have all the qualities and


incidents of negotiable instruments subject to the negotiable

Req. No. 1337 Page 2


instruments law of this state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or


in registered form, or both, as the Authority may determine, and


provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as


to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and


for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to


both principal and interest. The Authority may sell the bonds in


such amounts and in such manner, either at public or private sale,


and for such price, as it may determine to be in the best interest


of this state, but in no event at a discount in excess of that from


time to time expressed in said subsection E G of Section 176 of


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely


for the payment of the cost of the turnpike project for which such


bonds have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and


pursuant to such restrictions, if any, as the Authority may provide


in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the


trust agreement securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of


any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than


such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide


the amount of such deficit, and, unless otherwise provided for in


the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the


trust agreement securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same


issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without


preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds

Req. No. 1337 Page 3


of the bonds of any issue shall exceed such cost, the surplus shall


be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for such bonds, or


shall be used by the Authority in implementing any other power


expressly granted to the Authority in this article.


C. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority,


subject to like restrictions, may issue interim receipts or


temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for


definitive bonds when such bonds have been executed and are


available for delivery. The Authority may also provide for the


replacement of any bonds which have become mutilated or were


destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued pursuant to the provisions


of this article without obtaining the consent of any department,


division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of this state, and


without any other proceedings or the occurrence of any other


conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things


that are specifically required by this article.


D. The Authority is hereby authorized to provide that the


bonds:


1. Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for


purchase by the owner, provided a credit facility supports such


bonds, unless the Authority specifically determines that a credit


facility is not required;


2. Be additionally supported by a credit facility;



Req. No. 1337 Page 4


3. Be made subject to redemption prior to maturity, with or


without premium, on such notice and at such time or times and with


such redemption provisions as may be determined by the Authority or


with such variations as may be permitted in connection with a par


formula;


4. Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary as permitted


pursuant to a par formula and for such period or periods of time,


all as may be determined by the Authority; and


5. Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an


attempt is made to remarket the bonds to new purchasers prior to


their presentment for payment to the provider of the credit facility


or to the Authority.


No credit facility, repayment agreement, par formula or


remarketing agreement shall become effective without the approval of


the Authority.


E. As used in this section, the following terms shall have the


following meanings:


1. “Credit facility” means an agreement entered into by the


Authority with any bank, savings and loan association or other


banking institution; an insurance company, reinsurance company,


surety company, or other insurance institution; a corporation,


investment banker or other investment institution; or any other


financial institution providing for prompt payment of all or any


part of the principal, whether at maturity, presentment for

Req. No. 1337 Page 5


purchase, redemption or acceleration, redemption premium, if any,


and interest on any bonds payable on demand or tender by the owner


issued in accordance with this section, in consideration of the


Authority’s agreeing to repay the provider of such credit facility


in accordance with the terms and provisions of such repayment


agreement; provided, that any such repayment agreement shall provide


that the obligation of the Authority thereunder shall have only such


sources of payment as are permitted for the payment of the bonds


issued under this article; and


2. “Par formula” means any provision or formula adopted by the


Authority to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the


interest rate or rates borne by any such bonds so that the purchase


price of such bonds in the open market would be as close to par as


possible.


F. Nothing in any law heretofore enacted or enacted at the


present session of the Legislature shall be deemed to limit or


restrict the right of the Authority to issue bonds or other


obligations the interest income, in whole or in part, on which is


subject, directly or indirectly, to federal income taxation.


G. The Authority may enter into transactions utilizing


derivative products, and other financial products intended to hedge


interest rate risk, including any option to enter into or terminate


any of them, that the Authority deems to be necessary or desirable


in connection with any bonds issued prior to, at the same time as,

Req. No. 1337 Page 6


or after entering into such arrangement and containing terms and


provisions, and may be with such parties, as determined by the


Authority. Provided, any action taken by the Authority pursuant to


this subsection must first be approved by the Oklahoma State Bond


Advisor Deputy Treasurer for Debt Management and the Council of Bond


Oversight pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Bond Oversight


and Reform Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1337 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:46:49 AM





























Req. No. 1337 Page 7